Hawaii statutes.
§431:20-107 Capital requirements. A
title insurer shall have a minimum capital, which shall be paid in and
maintained, of not less than $400,000. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2 as superseded
by c 348, §21]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next